Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,142
Abandonment of a foreign nonprofit
domestication and conversion.

(MBCA 9.43) If the domestication and conversion of a foreign
nonprofit corporation to a domestic business corporation is abandoned in accordance
with the laws of the foreign jurisdiction after articles of domestication
and conversion have been filed with the Secretary of State, a statement that
the domestication and conversion has been abandoned, signed by an officer
or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the Secretary
of State for filing. The statement shall take effect upon filing and the domestication
and conversion shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 142.
January 1, 2016